Florida, session 2026, HB319.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida:

Section 1. The Commissioner of Insurance Regulation shall,
by December 31, 2027, initiate a compact with other states to
establish a national risk pool for property insurance for
natural disasters in order to reduce the financial risks to this
state and its residents and shall, as soon as feasible, enter
into the compact with at least 14 other member states.
Section 2. This act shall take effect July 1, 2026.
Page 1 of 1
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb319-00